District of Columbia statutes.
34-1312.05

Sale of the Bonds.

(a)

The Bonds of any series may be sold at negotiated or competitive sale at, above, or below par, to one or more persons or entities, and upon terms that the Mayor considers to be in the best interest of the District.

(b)

The Mayor may execute offering documents in connection with each sale of the Bonds, may deem final any such offering document for purposes of compliance with federal laws and regulations governing such matters, and may authorize the distribution of the documents in connection with the Bonds being sold.

(c)

The Mayor is authorized to deliver the executed and sealed Bonds for authentication, and, after the Bonds have been authenticated, to deliver the Bonds to the original purchasers of the Bonds upon payment of the purchase price.

(d)

The Bonds shall not be issued until the Mayor receives an approving opinion from bond counsel as to the validity of the Bonds of such series and, if the interest on the Bonds is expected to be exempt from federal income taxation, the treatment of the interest on the Bonds for purposes of federal income taxation.

(e)

Chapter 3A of Title 2 [§ 2-351.01 et seq.] and subchapter III-A of Chapter 3 of Title 47 [§ 47-351.01 et seq.] shall not apply to any contract the Mayor may from time to time enter into or determine to be necessary or appropriate for purposes of this chapter.

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 205, 61 DCR 1882

History